Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 7. High Voltage Lines.

Collateral references. —

29 C.J.S., Electricity, §§ 76 — 92, 123.

Sec. 18.60.670.
Prohibition against placement of equipment near electrical power lines and conductors.

A person individually or through an agent or employee may not

place any type of tool, equipment, machinery, or material that is capable of lateral, vertical, or swinging motion, within 10 feet of a high voltage overhead electrical line or conductor;

store, operate, erect, maintain, move, or transport tools, machinery, equipment, supplies, materials, apparatus, buildings, or other structures within 10 feet of a high voltage overhead electrical line or conductor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

42.20.032

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Subsection (2) of this section permits an operator to place equipment outside the 10-foot envelope, even though the equipment is capable of vertical, lateral, or swinging motion and thus capable of penetrating into the 10-foot envelope. AS

18.60.670

—

18.60.695

only prohibit the actual placement and operation of such equipment inside the 10-foot envelope. July 15, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.675.
Posting of warning sign before operation.

A person individually or through an agent or employee may not operate a crane, derrick, power shovel, drilling rig, hoisting equipment, or similar apparatus, any part of which is capable of vertical, lateral, or swinging motion, unless the operator or the operator’s employer posts and maintains, in plain view of the operator, a durable warning sign legible at 12 feet that reads as follows: “It is unlawful to operate this equipment within 10 feet of high voltage lines.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.20.034.
Renumbered in 1972.

Sec. 18.60.680.
Placement of barriers for temporary work.

Before a person is going to temporarily engage in work or other activity in closer proximity to a high voltage line or conductor than is permitted by AS

18.60.670

, the person shall immediately notify the operator or owner of the high voltage line or conductor of the work to be performed and make appropriate arrangements, with payment satisfactory to the operator, for the installation of temporary mechanical barriers, temporary deenergization and grounding of the conductors, or a temporary raising of the conductors.
Costs incurred by an operator or owner of a high voltage line or conductor in providing barriers, deenergization, and grounding as specified in this section shall be paid by the person engaging in the work that requires these protective measures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.20.036.
Renumbered in 1972.

Sec. 18.60.685.
Criminal penalty; civil liability for damages.

A person who violates AS

18.60.670

—

18.60.695

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

If a violation of AS

18.60.670

—

18.60.695

results in physical or electrical contact with an overhead high voltage line or conductor, the violator is liable to the owner or operator of the high voltage line or conductor for all damage to the facilities and for all liability incurred by the owner or operator as a result of the unlawful activities.

Each day on which a person fails to post or maintain a sign as required by AS

18.60.675

constitutes a separate and additional violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.20.037.
Renumbered in 1972.

Sec. 18.60.690.
Nonapplicability to certain activities.

AS

18.60.670

—

18.60.695

do not apply to

activities relating to high voltage overhead conductors or their supporting structures conducted by persons authorized by the operator or owner of high voltage overhead conductors or their supporting structures;

work done on telephone or communication circuits or their supporting structures;

the operation or maintenance of equipment traveling or moving upon fixed rails of a railroad; or

emergency situations in which life is endangered.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

42.20.038

.
Renumbered in 1972.

Sec. 18.60.695.
Definitions.

In AS

18.60.670

—

18.60.695

,

“high voltage” means a voltage in excess of 750 volts between conductors or between any single conductor and the ground;

“overhead lines or overhead conductors” means all bare or insulated electrical conductors installed aboveground except those that are deenergized and grounded or enclosed in iron pipe or other metal covering of equal strength.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.20.039.
Renumbered in 1972.